Utah statutes.
59-13-314.   Special fuel user permit required before registration of vehicle.

Before registering any motor vehicle which is operated by special fuels, the registered owner or lessee of the vehicle shall obtain a valid special fuel user permit for the current year if required under Section 59-13-303.



Amended by Chapter 153, 2008 General Session

